Utah statutes.
63B-6-202.    Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this part may not exceed
$600,000,000.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the
Department of Transportation to provide funds to pay all or part of the costs
of state highway construction projects.
(b)  These costs may include the cost of acquiring land, interests in land,
easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and making all improvements
necessary, incidental, or convenient to the facilities, interest estimated to
accrue on these bonds during the period to be covered by construction of the
projects plus a period of six months after the end of the construction period,
interest estimated to accrue on any bond anticipation notes issued under the
authority of Chapter 6, Part 3, Highway Bond Anticipation Note Authorization,
and all related engineering, architectural, and legal fees.
(3)  If, after completion of the projects authorized under Subsection (2)(a)
and payment of the costs of issuing and selling the bonds under Section
63B-6-203, any bond proceeds remain unexpended, the Department of
Transportation may use those unexpended proceeds to pay all or part of the
costs of construction projects approved by the Transportation Commission.
(4)  The commission, may, by resolution, make any statement of intent relating
to a reimbursement that is necessary or desirable to comply with federal tax
law.
(5)  The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements related to
that project before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this
chapter.
